New Jersey, session 221, A2496.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 1 of P.L.2020, c.75 (C.45:1-7.8) is amended to read as follows: 1.    Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, rule, or regulation, lawful presence in the United States shall not be required to obtain a professional or occupational license, provided that the applicant meets all other requirements for licensure. This section shall apply to any license, certification, or registration issued by any entity designated in section 2 of P.L.1978, c.73 (C.45:1-15), or by any principal department of the Executive Branch of State government or any entity within any department or any other entity hereafter created to license or otherwise regulate a profession or occupation. (cf: P.L.2020, c.75, s.1) 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.